Utah statutes.
31A-2-310.   Procedure for service of process through state officer.
(1)  Service upon the commissioner or lieutenant governor under Section
31A-2-309 is service on the principal, if:
(a)  two copies of the process are delivered personally or to the office of
the official designated in Section 31A-2-309, and
(b)  that official mails a copy of the process to the person to be served
according to Subsection (2)(b).
(2) (a)  The commissioner and the lieutenant governor shall give receipts for
and keep records of all process served through them.
(b)  The commissioner or the lieutenant governor shall immediately send by
certified mail one copy of the process received to the person to be served at
that person's last known principal place of business, residence, or post-
office address.  The commissioner or the lieutenant governor shall retain the
other copy for his files.
(c)  No plaintiff or complainant may take a judgment by default in any
proceeding in which process is served under this section and Section 31A-2-309
until the expiration of 40 days from the date of service of process under
Subsection (2)(b).
(3)  Proof of service shall be evidenced by a certificate by the official
designated in Section 31A-2-309, showing service made upon him and mailing by
him, and attached to a copy of the process presented to him for that purpose.
(4)  When process is served under this section, the words "twenty days" in the
first sentence of Rule 12(a) of the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure shall be
changed to read "forty days."
